test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-unchecked-tests_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# â stems


  Noun - nuorâ: # â-stems
    nuorâ+A+Sg+Nom: nuoṛâ
    nuorâ+A+Attr: nuo'ṛâ
    nuorâ+A+Sg+Gen: nuorâ
    nuorâ+A+Sg+Acc: nuorâ
    nuorâ+A+Sg+Ill: nuoṛân
    nuorâ+A+Sg+Loc: nuorâst
    nuorâ+A+Sg+Com: [nuoráin, nuorááin]
    nuorâ+A+Sg+Abe: nuo'râttáá
    nuorâ+A+Ess: nuorrân
    nuorâ+A+Par: nuorrâd
    nuorâ+A+Pl+Nom: nuorah
    nuorâ+A+Pl+Gen: nuorâi
    nuorâ+A+Pl+Acc: nuorâid
    nuorâ+A+Pl+Ill: [nuoráid, nuorááid]
    nuorâ+A+Pl+Loc: nuorâin
    nuorâ+A+Pl+Com: [nuo'râiguin, nuo'râiguim, nuo'râigijn]
    nuorâ+A+Pl+Abe: nuo'râittáá
